Maryland, session 2025, HB1386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), and (f) of this section, each public
school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1386*

HOUSE BILL 1386
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day; and
(3) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to meet
the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(c) (1) The following days are public school holidays:
(i) Thanksgiving Day and the day after;
(ii) Christmas Eve and from then through January 1;
(iii) Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;
(iv) Presidents’ Day;
(v) The Friday before Easter and from then through the Monday
after Easter;
(vi) Memorial Day; and
(vii) Primary and general election days.
(2) If the federal and State observances of a holiday are on different days,
the board of education of each county shall determine which date shall be the date of
observance for the public schools within the county.
(3) The public schools shall devote a part of at least one day to appropriate
exercises for each of the following:
(i) Washington’s Birthday;
(ii) Lincoln’s Birthday;
(iii) Veterans’ Day;
(iv) Columbus Day;
(v) Arbor Day;

HOUSE BILL 1386 3
(vi) Black History Month, with an emphasis on Harriet Tubman and
Frederick Douglass and the contributions they made in the fight against slavery; and
(vii) Any other day of national significance.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the public schools,
in the following counties, may remain open and in session on primary and general election
days:
(i) Calvert;
(ii) Caroline;
(iii) Dorchester;
(iv) Kent;
(v) Talbot; and
(vi) Worcester.
(5) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN HOWARD COUNTY.
(II) THE HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL
CLOSE PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY, INCLUDING ALL BUILDINGS AND OFFICES,
TO OBSERVE THE FOLLOWING HOLIDAYS:
1. IF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING HOLIDAYS BEGIN ON A
WEEKDAY, THE FIRST DAY ONLY OF:
A. DIWALI;
B. EID AL–ADHA;
C. EID AL–FITR;
D. LUNAR NEW YEAR; AND
E. ROSH HASHANAH; AND
2. YOM KIPPUR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.